Maine, session 132, LD496.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2202, as amended by PL 2021, c. 62, §2, is further amended to
read:
§2202. Silver Alert Program
In accordance with this chapter and with the cooperation of the Department of
Transportation, the Maine Turnpike Authority, a statewide organization representing
broadcast groups in the State, the Office of the Governor and appropriate law enforcement
agencies, the department shall develop and implement the Silver Alert Program to be
activated on behalf of missing endangered persons. The program must include standards
of procedure for local law enforcement agencies to determine that a missing person is a
missing endangered person, to determine information to be released regarding the missing
endangered person or the circumstances of the person's disappearance and to appropriately
activate a Silver Alert to local or statewide law enforcement agencies and to the media, a
plan for providing relevant information to the public through an existing system of dynamic
message signs located across the State when necessary and training for all law enforcement
officers. The Silver Alert Program must require that all Silver Alerts be issued to all
hospitals and homeless shelters in the State and to a statewide association of libraries. The
Silver Alert Program must be developed and implemented using existing resources.
Page 1 - 132LR0396(03)